District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.10

Civil penalty inflation adjustment.

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia is granted the authority to, at least once every 4 years, promulgate rules to adjust the amounts of the civil penalties listed in § 2-381.02 by the same amount that the Attorney General of the United States shall, from time to time, adjust the civil monetary penalties found in 31 U.S.C. § 3729 pursuant to the procedures described in the Federal Civil Penalties Inflation Adjustment Act of 1990, approved October 5, 1990 (104 Stat. 890; 28 U.S.C. § 2461 , note). Any increase to a civil penalty as provided in this section shall only apply to violations which occur after the date the increase takes effect.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 822
as added Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-232, § 2(h), 59 DCR 13632
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-232 added this section.